Utah statutes.
17-27a-508.   Applicant's entitlement to land use application approval --
Exceptions -- Application relating to land in a high priority transportation
corridor -- County's requirements and limitations -- Vesting upon submission
of development plan and schedule.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), an applicant is entitled to
approval of a land use application if the application conforms to the
requirements of the county's land use maps, zoning map, and applicable land
use ordinance in effect when a complete application is submitted and all
application fees have been paid, unless:
(i)  the land use authority, on the record, finds that a compelling,
countervailing public interest would be jeopardized by approving the
application; or
(ii)  in the manner provided by local ordinance and before the application is
submitted, the county has formally initiated proceedings to amend its
ordinances in a manner that would prohibit approval of the application as
submitted.
(b) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(c), an applicant is not entitled
to approval of a land use application until the requirements of this
Subsection (1)(b) have been met if the land use application relates to land
located within the boundaries of a high priority transportation corridor
designated in accordance with Section 72-5-403.
(ii) (A)  A county shall notify the executive director of the Department of
Transportation of any land use applications that relate to land located within
the boundaries of a high priority transportation corridor.
(B)  The notification under Subsection (1)(b)(ii)(A) shall be in writing and
mailed by certified or registered mail to the executive director of the
Department of Transportation.
(iii)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(c), a county may not approve a
land use application that relates to land located within the boundaries of a
high priority transportation corridor until:
(A)  30 days after the notification under Subsection (1)(b)(ii) is received by
the Department of Transportation if the land use application is for a building
permit; or
(B)  45 days after the notification under Subsection (1)(b)(ii) is received by
the Department of Transportation if the land use application is for any land
use other than a building permit.
(c) (i)  A land use application is exempt from the requirements of Subsection
(1)(b) if:
(A)  the land use application relates to land that was the subject of a
previous land use application; and
(B)  the previous land use application described under Subsection (1)(c)(i)(A)
complied with the requirements of Subsection (1)(b).
(ii)  A county may approve a land use application without making the required
notifications under Subsection (1)(b) if:
(A)  the land use application relates to land that was the subject of a
previous land use application; and
(B)  the previous land use application described under Subsection
(1)(c)(ii)(A) complied with the requirements of Subsection (1)(b).
(d)  After a county has complied with the requirements of Subsection (1)(b)
for a land use application, the county may not withhold approval of the land
use application for which the applicant is otherwise entitled under Subsection
(1)(a).
(e)  The county shall process an application without regard to proceedings
initiated to amend the county's ordinances as provided in Subsection
(1)(a)(ii) if:
(i)  180 days have passed since the proceedings were initiated; and
(ii)  the proceedings have not resulted in an enactment that prohibits
approval of the application as submitted.
(f)  An application for a land use approval is considered submitted and
complete when the application is provided in a form that complies with the
requirements of applicable ordinances and all applicable fees have been paid.
(g)  The continuing validity of an approval of a land use application is
conditioned upon the applicant proceeding after approval to implement the
approval with reasonable diligence.
(h)  A county may not impose on a holder of an issued land use permit or
approved subdivision plat a requirement that is not expressed:
(i)  in the land use permit or subdivision plat documents on which the land
use permit or subdivision plat is based, or the written record evidencing
approval of the land use permit or subdivision plat; or
(ii)  in this chapter or the county's ordinances.
(i)  A county may not withhold issuance of a certificate of occupancy or
acceptance of subdivision improvements because of an applicant's failure to
comply with a requirement that is not expressed:
(i)  in the building permit or subdivision plat, documents on which the
building permit or subdivision plat is based, or the written record evidencing
approval of the building permit or subdivision plat; or
(ii)  in this chapter or the county's ordinances.
(2)  A county is bound by the terms and standards of applicable land use
ordinances and shall comply with mandatory provisions of those ordinances.
(3)  A county may not, as a condition of land use application approval,
require a person filing a land use application to obtain documentation
regarding a school district's willingness, capacity, or ability to serve the
development proposed in the land use application.
(4)  Upon a specified public agency's submission of a development plan and
schedule as required in Subsection 17-27a-305(9) that complies with the
requirements of that subsection, the specified public agency vests in the
county's applicable land use maps, zoning map, hookup fees, impact fees, other
applicable development fees, and land use ordinances in effect on the date of
submission.
